Washington statutes.
RCW 2.04.240

Judge pro tempore—Declaration of policy—Appointment—Oath of office.

(1) DECLARATION OF POLICY. Whenever necessary for the prompt and orderly administration of justice, as authorized and empowered by Article IV, section 2(a), Amendment 38, of the state Constitution, a majority of the supreme court may appoint any regularly elected and qualified judge of the court of appeals or the superior court or any retired judge of a court of record in this state to serve as judge pro tempore of the supreme court.

(2) If the term of a justice of the supreme court expires with cases or other judicial business pending, the chief justice of the supreme court may appoint the justice to serve as judge pro tempore of the supreme court, whenever necessary for the prompt and orderly administration of justice. No justice may be appointed under this subsection more than one time and no appointment may exceed sixty days.

(3) Before entering upon his or her duties as judge pro tempore of the supreme court, the appointee shall take and subscribe an oath of office as provided for in Article IV, section 28 of the state Constitution.

[ 1997 c 88 s 1; 1982 c 72 s 1; 1963 c 40 s 1.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: SAR 21.